Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5976.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to provide for the audit and examination of this state and state funds; to provide for the audit and examination of the books and accounts of all branches, departments, offices, boards, commissions, agencies, authorities, and institutions of this state; to prescribe powers and duties of certain state officers and employees; to provide for access to records; to provide for the subpoena of witnesses and production of documents and records; to provide for the investigation of reports of fraudulent conduct; to provide for civil actions to recover certain state funds; to authorize rewards; to prescribe penalties; and to provide for the administration of this act. Sec. 3. (1) An individual employed in the news industry, including, but not limited to, a news analyst, reporter, or journalist, or an individual acting in the manner of an individual employed in the news industry as an independent journalist, who has knowledge of any fraud, waste, abuse, misappropriation, or misuse of state funds involving state officers, state employees, or any other entities receiving state funds or other financial assistance may report and transmit all facts and information in that individual's possession concerning the alleged fraud, waste, abuse, misappropriation, or misuse of state funds, including the failure to meet any conditions or obligations related to the state funds or other financial assistance received, to the office of the auditor general. Not later than 6 months after receiving a report under this section, the auditor general shall review the report and may investigate, audit, disregard, or forward any report as provided in this section. The auditor general may disregard a report if the auditor general determines that 1 or more of the following apply: (a) The report is trivial, frivolous, vexatious, or not made in good faith. (b) The report is not timely or is too long delayed to justify further investigation. (c) It is more appropriate to handle the report as part of an ongoing or scheduled regular audit. (2) If the auditor general disregards a report under subsection (1), the auditor general shall provide notice to the attorney general that includes the auditor general's reasoning. If the auditor general determines that it is more appropriate for the report to be investigated or enforced by another state department, office, board, commission, agency, authority, or institution that is responsible for the distribution and oversight of the state funds or other financial assistance for which an alleged fraud, waste, abuse, misappropriation, or misuse was reported, the auditor general shall refer that report and the auditor general's findings and any recommendations to the attorney general and the appropriate state entity. However, the auditor general shall not refer a report to be investigated by the same entity in which the alleged fraud, waste, abuse, misappropriation, or misuse was alleged to have occurred. (3) Except as otherwise provided under this section, if the attorney general or other state department, office, board, commission, agency, authority, or institution proceeds with any administrative or judicial action based on the report submitted to the office of the auditor general under subsection (1) and the action leads to the successful recovery of state funds, the individual who submitted that report must receive an award of at least 15% of the funds collected as a result of the action, including any related actions, or from any settlement in response to the action. The determination of the amount of the award depends on the extent to which the information provided by that individual contributed to the successful recovery of state funds. (4) If the appropriate state entity or court finds that an action under this section is based primarily on disclosure of specific information that was not provided by the individual who submitted the initial report under subsection (1), such as information from a criminal, civil, or administrative hearing in a state or federal department or agency or a legislative report, hearing, audit, or investigation, the appropriate state entity or court shall not award that individual more than 10% of the funds recovered as a result of that action. (5) If the appropriate state entity or court finds that the individual who submitted an initial report under subsection (1) planned and initiated the conduct on which the action is brought, then the amount of the award may be reduced or eliminated, as determined appropriate. (6) A person other than the attorney general shall not bring an action under this section that is based on allegations or transactions that are the subject of a civil suit or an administrative civil money penalty proceeding to which this state or the federal government is already a party. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Abuse" means the intentional, wrongful, or improper use or destruction of state resources or a seriously improper practice that does not involve prosecutable fraud. Abuse includes the excessive or improper use of an employee's or officer's position in a manner other than its rightful or legal use. (b) "Fraud" means a dishonest and deliberate course of action that results in obtaining money, property, or an advantage to which an employee or officer committing the action would not normally be entitled. Fraud includes intentional misleading or deceitful conduct that deprives this state of its resources or rights. A mere mistake or error does not constitute fraud unless made with negligent disregard for the truth. (c) "Misappropriation" means the theft of an entity's assets that causes the financial statements not to be presented in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles. Misappropriation includes the creation of false or misleading records or documents, including by creating or circumventing controls that may accompany misappropriation of those funds. (d) "Waste" means the needless, careless, or extravagant expenditure of state funds, incurring of unnecessary expenses, or mismanagement of state resources or property. Waste does not necessarily involve private use or personal gain but likely signifies poor management decisions, practices, or controls.